Idaho, session 2025, H0324.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-910, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-910. UNITED STATES SENATOR -- VACANCIES, HOW FILLED. Whenever any
vacancy shall occur in the office of United States senator from the state
of Idaho by death, resignation or otherwise, the governor shall have the
power and is hereby authorized and empowered to fill such vacancy by appoint-
ment, and the person so appointed shall hold such office until such time as
a United States senator is regularly elected to fill such vacancy, at the
next succeeding general election, and qualifies by virtue of such election:
provided, however, that in case a vacancy occurs in the position of United
States senator from the state of Idaho within thirty (30) days of any general
election, no election for United States senator to fill said vacancy shall
be held at such general election appoint a day to hold an election, subject
to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, to fill such a vacancy and
cause notice of such election to be given as provided in section 34-1406,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-106. LIMITATION UPON ELECTIONS. On and after January 1, 2011,
notwithstanding any other provisions of the law to the contrary, there shall
be no more than two (2) elections conducted in any county in any calendar
year, except as provided in this section or section 34-220, Idaho Code, and
except that elections to fill vacancies in the United States house of rep-
resentatives and the United States senate shall be held as provided in the
governor's proclamation.
(1) The dates on which elections may be conducted are:
(a) The third Tuesday in May of each year; and
(b) The Tuesday following the first Monday in November of each year.
(c) In addition to the elections specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection and subsection (7) of this section, an emergency elec-
tion may be called upon motion of the governing board of a political sub-
division. An emergency exists when there is a great public calamity,
such as an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, epidemic, or other disas-


ter, or when it is necessary to do emergency work to prepare for national
or local defense or to safeguard life, health or property.
(2) Candidates for office elected in May shall take office on the date
specified in the certificate of election but not more than sixty (60) days
following the election.
(3) Candidates for office elected in November shall take office as pro-
vided in the constitution or on January 1 next succeeding the November elec-
tion.
(4) The governing board of each political subdivision subject to the
provisions of this section that, prior to January 1, 2011, conducted an elec-
tion for members of that governing board on a date other than a date permit-
ted in subsection (1) of this section shall establish as the election date
for that political subdivision the date authorized in subsection (1) of this
section that falls nearest the date on which elections were previously con-
ducted, unless another date is established by law.
(5) The secretary of state is authorized to provide such assistance as
necessary and to prescribe any needed rules or interpretations for the con-
duct of election authorized under the provisions of this section.
(6) Water districts governed by chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code, are ex-
empt from the provisions of this section.
(7) Community colleges governed by chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code,
and school districts are subject to the limitations specified in subsection
(1) of this section.
(8) A city initiative or referendum election shall be held on the Tues-
day following the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years. A county
initiative or referendum election or a bond, levy and any other ballot ques-
tion elections conducted by any political subdivision shall be held on the
nearest date authorized in subsection (1) of this section that falls more
than sixty (60) days after the clerk of the political subdivision orders that
such election shall be held in May or November of even-numbered years or more
than fifty (50) days after the order for all other elections, unless other-
wise provided by law. Ballot language for any question to be placed on the
ballot shall be submitted to the county clerk at least sixty (60) days before
an election held in May or November of even-numbered years and at least fifty
(50) days before all other elections.
(9) Recall elections may be held on any of the three (3) dates autho-
rized in subsections (1) and (7) of this section that fall more than forty-
five (45) days after the clerk of the political subdivision orders that such
election shall be held.
(10) Irrigation districts governed by title 43, Idaho Code, are subject
to the limitations specified in subsection (1) of this section, except that
irrigation districts may also hold an election on the first Tuesday in Febru-
ary of each year and on the first Tuesday in August of each year on questions
required to be voted upon by title 43, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.